Illinois, session 104th, SB3308.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Automated Driving Systems Development Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Automated driving system" means hardware and software 8that are collectively capable of performing the entire dynamic 9driving task on a sustained basis, regardless of whether 10limited to a specific operational design domain.11    "Autonomous vehicle operator" means a person or business 12operating highly automated vehicles on public roads and 13highways of this State in connection with an automated vehicle 14pilot project.15    "Automated vehicle pilot project" means a pilot or 16demonstration project that is performed under this Act and 17that authorizes eligible autonomous vehicle operators to make 18a highly automated vehicle available to the public for testing 19on the public roads and highways of this State.20    "Crash" means any physical contact between the highly 21automated vehicle and any object that results in damage to the 22object or the vehicle or any physical contact between the 23highly automated vehicle and another vehicle, person, mammal,   SB3308- 2 -LRB104 19909 LNS 33359 b1or reptile.2    "Dynamic driving task" means all of the real-time 3operational and tactical functions required to operate a 4vehicle in on-road traffic, excluding the strategic functions, 5such as trip scheduling and selection of destinations and 6waypoints. "Dynamic driving task" includes, without 7limitation:8        (1) lateral vehicle motion control via steering;9        (2) longitudinal motion control via acceleration and 10    deceleration;11        (3) monitoring the driving environment via object and 12    event detection, recognition, classification, and response 13    preparation;14        (4) object and event response execution;15        (5) maneuver planning; and16        (6) enhancing conspicuity via lighting, signaling, and 17    gesturing.18    "Evaluation data" means any data necessary to support the 19testing, development, legal and regulatory compliance, 20operation, safety, and improvement of automated driving 21systems or highly automated vehicles, including, but not 22limited to, real-time perception, crash avoidance, and sensor, 23environmental, traffic, communication, network, camera, and 24incident data.25    "Highly automated vehicle" means a motor vehicle equipped 26with an automated driving system that is designed to function   SB3308- 3 -LRB104 19909 LNS 33359 b1without a human driver in the vehicle at a level of driving 2automation of 4 or 5 as specified in the Society of Automotive 3Engineers International Standard J3016 (April 2021).4    "Incident report" means a report containing information on 5collisions and other incidents as described in Section 35.6    "Operational design domain" means the specific operating 7conditions under which a given automated driving system is 8specifically designed to function, including, but not limited 9to, geographic area, roadway type, speed range, environmental 10conditions, and other domain constraints.11    "Permit to participate in an automated vehicle pilot 12project" means a permit issued by the Secretary of State 13allowing for an autonomous vehicle operator to operate the 14highly automated vehicle on State roadways within the 15operational design domain as described on the permit.16    "Public information portal" means a publicly available 17website maintained by an autonomous vehicle operator, 18containing all necessary disclosures required by this Act.19    "Processing" or "process" means any operation or set of 20operations that is performed on data or on sets of data, 21whether by automated means, including, but not limited to, 22collection, recording, organization, structuring, storage, 23adaptation or alteration, retrieval, consultation, use, 24disclosure by transmission, dissemination or otherwise making 25available, alignment or combination, restriction, erasure, or 26destruction.  SB3308- 4 -LRB104 19909 LNS 33359 b1    "Review committee" means the committee formed by the 2Department of Transportation under Section 20. 3    Section 10. Automated vehicle pilot project eligibility.4    (a) The operation of highly automated vehicles 5participating in an automated vehicle pilot project is subject 6to all applicable federal and State laws.7    If the highly automated vehicle is used for transporting 8persons in a manner consistent with a taxi, livery, or 9ridesharing service, then all applicable municipal ordinances 10which govern taxi, livery, and ridesharing services set forth 11by the municipalities contained within the operational design 12domain shall apply to the autonomous vehicle operator and 13highly automated vehicle. This provision is applicable 14regardless of whether money is exchanged for the service 15provided. This provision does not apply if the person being 16transported is an employee of the autonomous vehicle operator.17    (b) An autonomous vehicle operator is eligible to apply 18for participation in an automated vehicle pilot project if the 19highly automated vehicle to be operated meets all applicable 20certificate of title, registration, licensing, and insurance 21requirements of the State.22    (c) An autonomous vehicle operator shall develop for each 23manufacturer and model of highly automated vehicle:24        (1) a law enforcement interaction plan, which shall 25    include:  SB3308- 5 -LRB104 19909 LNS 33359 b1            (A) instructions on how to communicate with the 2        autonomous vehicle operator or its employees, 3        including providing a contact telephone number for the 4        autonomous vehicle operator or its employees;5            (B) instructions on where, in the vehicle, to 6        obtain autonomous vehicle operator information, 7        vehicle registration, and proof of insurance in the 8        event of a crash or traffic violation involving the 9        vehicle;10            (C) instructions on how to safely remove the 11        vehicle from the roadway; and12            (D) any additional information the autonomous 13        vehicle operator deems necessary regarding hazardous 14        conditions or public safety risks associated with the 15        operation of the highly automated vehicle;16        (2) a first responder and firefighting plan, which 17    shall include:18            (A) schematics showing the routing of electrical 19        cables throughout the vehicle which may cause death or 20        serious injury if contact is made with them while 21        energized;22            (B) information regarding the chemical composition 23        and location of any battery storage present on the 24        vehicle along with hazards presented by those 25        batteries;26            (C) step-by-step instructions on how to disconnect   SB3308- 6 -LRB104 19909 LNS 33359 b1        and render electrical cables safe if possible, or a 2        warning if it is not possible; and3            (D) the recommended extinguishing agent for 4        suppressing any fire that originates from or 5        encompasses the vehicle.6    (d) The highly automated vehicle must meet safety 7standards set forth for passenger vehicles by the National 8Highway Traffic Safety Administration, and emissions 9requirements set forth by the United States Environmental 10Protection Agency.11    (e) An autonomous vehicle operator must publish the 12following on a public information portal prior to applying for 13participation in an automated vehicle pilot project:14        (1) a contact form or contact information that allows 15    any law enforcement agency in this State to contact the 16    autonomous vehicle operator and receive a copy of all law 17    enforcement interaction plans that pertain to highly 18    automated vehicles which the autonomous vehicle operator 19    intends to operate in this State; and20        (2) all first responder and firefighting plans that 21    pertain to highly automated vehicles which the autonomous 22    vehicle operator intends to operate in this State. 23    Section 15. Application for participation in an automated 24vehicle pilot project.25    (a) An autonomous vehicle operator shall submit the   SB3308- 7 -LRB104 19909 LNS 33359 b1following to the Secretary of State for each highly automated 2vehicle that the autonomous vehicle operator intends to 3operate:4        (1) a written description of the highly automated 5    vehicle that includes, but is not limited to, 6    manufacturer, model, model year, color, gross vehicle 7    weight, the maximum number of passengers the vehicle will 8    carry, and the name and version number of the software of 9    the automated driving system;10        (2) a written statement acknowledging all of the 11    following:12            (A) when required by federal law, the highly 13        automated vehicle is in compliance with all applicable 14        federal laws and federal motor vehicle safety 15        standards and bears the required certification labels, 16        including reference to any applicable exemption 17        granted by the National Highway Traffic Safety 18        Administration;19            (B) if a failure of the automated driving system 20        occurs that renders that system unable to perform the 21        entire dynamic driving task relevant to its intended 22        operational design domain, the vehicle will achieve a 23        minimal risk condition, which is a stable, stopped 24        condition to which an employee of the autonomous 25        vehicle operator or an automated driving system may 26        bring a vehicle in order to reduce the risk of a crash;  SB3308- 8 -LRB104 19909 LNS 33359 b1            (C) the highly automated vehicle is capable of 2        complying with all applicable traffic and motor 3        vehicle safety laws and the autonomous vehicle 4        operator will be issued a traffic citation or other 5        applicable penalty if the vehicle fails to comply with 6        applicable traffic or motor vehicle laws when the 7        automated driving system is engaged;8            (D) when the highly automated vehicle is under the 9        control of an employee or representative of the 10        autonomous vehicle operator, and is physically present 11        in the vehicle, the employee or representative will be 12        issued a traffic citation or other applicable penalty 13        if the vehicle fails to comply with applicable traffic 14        or motor vehicle laws; and15            (E) if the highly automated vehicle is involved in 16        a crash, the autonomous vehicle operator shall be 17        considered the financially responsible party for all 18        liability issues and insurance settlement processes, 19        regardless of whether the automated driving system was 20        engaged;21        (3) proof of comprehensive automotive insurance 22    listing the autonomous vehicle operator as the covered 23    party with minimum coverage amounts of $3,000,000 per 24    instance of personal injury up to $6,000,000 overall and 25    $1,000,000 per instance of property damage up to 26    $2,000,000 overall;  SB3308- 9 -LRB104 19909 LNS 33359 b1        (4) a description of the desired operational design 2    domain for the automated vehicle pilot project, including, 3    but not limited to:4            (A) a full description via boundary coordinates 5        and illustrated map of the desired geographic 6        boundaries in which the highly automated vehicle will 7        operate. These boundaries must fall entirely within 8        Cook, St. Clair, and Madison Counties;9            (B) the desired weekly schedule of operation of 10        the highly automated vehicle, specifying start and 11        finish each day of a standard 7-day week;12            (C) the desired weather conditions that the highly 13        automated vehicle would operate in, including cloud 14        cover, wind speed, and precipitation types and 15        amounts;16            (D) the maximum speed at which the highly 17        automated vehicle will operate; and18            (E) the type of roadways that the highly automated 19        vehicle will operate on, including descriptions of the 20        type of road along with the surface conditions and 21        maximum camber of roadway;22        (5) the preferred start date and end date of the 23    automated vehicle pilot project; and24        (6) an application fee of $2,500 payable to the 25    Secretary of State.   SB3308- 10 -LRB104 19909 LNS 33359 b1    Section 20. Review committee.2    (a) The Department of Transportation shall form a standing 3review committee and develop administrative rules to 4facilitate the review committee's operation. The review 5committee shall meet at least once per month once the members 6have all been seated. Membership shall consist of the 7following:8        (1) 2 members from the Department of Transportation, 9    appointed by Department of Transportation staff; 10        (2) 2 members from the Secretary of State, appointed 11    by Secretary of State staff;12        (3) one member from the Illinois State Police, 13    appointed by the Director of the Illinois State Police;14        (4) one member from an alliance representing the 15    automotive industry, appointed by the Department of 16    Transportation via an application process that shall only 17    be open to such alliances;18        (5) one member from an association representing 19    bicyclists and pedestrians, appointed by the Department of 20    Transportation via an application process that shall only 21    be open to such associations;22        (6) one member from a State motorcycle rights 23    organization, appointed by the Department of 24    Transportation via an application process that shall only 25    be open to such organizations;26        (7) one member from a public transit labor union,   SB3308- 11 -LRB104 19909 LNS 33359 b1    appointed by the Department of Transportation via an 2    application process that shall only be open to such 3    unions;4        (8) one member from a transportation union 5    representing CDL drivers, appointed by the Department of 6    Transportation via an application process that shall only 7    be open to such unions; and8        (9) one member from an organization representing 9    trucking companies, appointed by the Department of 10    Transportation via an application process that shall only 11    be open to such organizations.12    (b) The review committee shall review all applications for 13participation in an automated vehicle pilot project sent to 14the review committee by the Secretary of State and return a 15recommendation within 60 days for approval or denial of the 16application in whole, or approval of the application with a 17recommended modification of the operational design domain.18    (c) The review committee shall review all incident reports 19sent to them by autonomous vehicle operators and make 20recommendations to the Secretary of State as to any corrective 21actions, up to and including suspension, that may need to be 22taken on affected permits to participate in an automated 23vehicle pilot project.24    (d) The Department of Transportation shall maintain an 25email address for the public to submit complaints about the 26operation of highly automated vehicles in this State,   SB3308- 12 -LRB104 19909 LNS 33359 b1including any photos or videos they wish to submit.2    (e) The review committee shall review complaints submitted 3by the public and make recommendations to the Secretary of 4State as to any corrective actions, up to and including 5revocation, that may need to be taken on affected permits to 6participate in an automated vehicle pilot project. 7    Section 25. Testing, permit approval, suspension, 8reinstatement, and revocation.9    (a) The Secretary of State shall develop a driving test to 10evaluate the capability of highly automated vehicles to safely 11operate on State roads. The test shall have similar standards 12to the testing required to qualify for a Class D driver's 13license and be conducted in a manner that reduces the risk to 14human life either through a closed-circuit course or tightly 15controlled on-road test with the ability to shut the vehicle 16down instantly.17    (b) The Secretary of State may issue a permit for an 18autonomous vehicle operator to participate in an automated 19vehicle pilot project after the following conditions are met:20        (1) the highly automated vehicle described in the 21    application for permit has successfully completed a 22    driving test developed by the Secretary of State under 23    subsection (a) and the automated driving system was 24    engaged for the duration of the test; and25        (2) the Secretary of State has received a   SB3308- 13 -LRB104 19909 LNS 33359 b1    recommendation to approve the application for a permit to 2    participate in an automated vehicle pilot project either 3    in whole or with modifications to the operational design 4    domain.5    (c) A permit to participate in an automated vehicle pilot 6project shall at least include the following:7        (1) a unique permit number to be filed and tracked by 8    the Secretary of State;9        (2) the description of the highly automated vehicle as 10    submitted by the autonomous vehicle operator;11        (3) a description of the operational design domain as 12    recommended by the review committee; and13        (4) a unique number to be displayed on the highly 14    automated vehicle consisting of at least one letter and 4 15    numbers.16    (d) The Secretary of State shall suspend an autonomous 17vehicle operator's permit to participate in an automated 18vehicle pilot project when any of the following conditions are 19met:20        (1) the Secretary of State, the Illinois State Police, 21    or the Department of Transportation has determined the 22    continued operation of the highly automated vehicle under 23    the conditions of the permit pose a hazard to public 24    safety; or25        (2) a recommendation to suspend the permit has been 26    received from the review committee.  SB3308- 14 -LRB104 19909 LNS 33359 b1    (e) The Secretary of State shall provide a notice 2suspending the permit to participate in an automated vehicle 3pilot project to the autonomous vehicle operator which shall 4include a brief summary of the determination and evidence 5supporting the determination.6    (f) An autonomous vehicle operator shall have 30 days from 7the receipt of a notice of suspension to ensure that the issues 8identified in the notice are corrected and provide to the 9Secretary of State, in the form and manner prescribed by the 10Secretary of State, a certification acknowledging that the 11issues identified in the notice have been corrected. A 12certification provided under this subsection must include an 13explanation of how the issues identified by the notice have 14been corrected, such as identifying specific adjustments made 15to the automated driving system or repairs made to the highly 16automated vehicle.17    (g) If the autonomous vehicle operator fails to correct 18the issues within the 30-day timeframe, or if the Secretary of 19State determines that the corrective actions taken are 20insufficient, then the permit to participate in an automated 21vehicle pilot project is revoked. Such determinations may be 22made with or without recommendations from the review 23committee.24    (h) If the Secretary of State determines that the 25corrective actions taken by the autonomous vehicle operator 26are sufficient, then the permit to participate in an automated   SB3308- 15 -LRB104 19909 LNS 33359 b1vehicle pilot project is reinstated. Such determinations may 2be made with or without recommendations from the review 3committee.4    (i) If a permit to participate in an automated vehicle 5pilot project is suspended more than 2 times during its 6duration, then the permit is revoked.7    (j) Operation of a highly automated vehicle without a 8valid permit to participate in an automated vehicle pilot 9project shall result in the revocation of all of the 10autonomous vehicle operator's permits to participate in an 11automated vehicle pilot project and prohibits the autonomous 12vehicle operator from being issued a new permit for at least 18 13months. 14    Section 30. Automated vehicle pilot project commencement; 15operation.16    (a) An automated vehicle pilot project may be commenced by 17an autonomous vehicle operator after the start date listed on 18the permit to participate in an automated vehicle pilot 19project, and during the times specified by the operational 20design domain on the permit.21    (b) An autonomous vehicle operator may engage in multiple 22automated vehicle pilot projects as long as the autonomous 23vehicle operator has a valid permit for each project.24    (c) A highly automated vehicle operated under the terms of 25a valid permit to participate in an automated vehicle pilot   SB3308- 16 -LRB104 19909 LNS 33359 b1project shall display the unique number described in paragraph 2(4) of subsection (c) of Section 25 in black vinyl or painted 3lettering at least 1.5 inches in height in a conspicuous spot 4on the vehicle above the right front tire, rear left tire, and 5on the rear of the vehicle at least 36 inches above the ground.6    (d) An autonomous vehicle operator may charge fees to 7members of the public for passenger trips made in connection 8with each automated vehicle pilot project.9    (e) Operation of a highly automated vehicle outside of the 10operational design domain described on the permit to 11participate in an automated vehicle pilot project shall result 12in revocation of the permit.13    (f) A copy of the permit to participate in an automated 14vehicle pilot project must be present in the highly automated 15vehicle and available for inspection by law enforcement. 16    Section 35. Required reporting and data sharing.17    (a) An autonomous vehicle operator shall publish a list of 18each highly automated vehicle under the autonomous vehicle 19operator's operation which is operating under the conditions 20of a permit to participate in an automated vehicle pilot 21project on a public information portal. The first publishing 22of a vehicle's information must occur within 3 days of the 23start date of the permit and then updated on a semi-monthly 24basis afterward. The list shall remain published after the end 25date listed on the permit to participate in an automated   SB3308- 17 -LRB104 19909 LNS 33359 b1vehicle pilot project and shall include:2        (1) a description of the highly automated vehicle 3    covered by each permit, including the color, model year, 4    manufacturer, model, unique number assigned under 5    paragraph (4) of subsection (c) of Section 25, and a 6    picture of the vehicle;7        (2) the odometer reading of the vehicle at the 8    beginning of operation under the permit to participate in 9    an automated vehicle pilot project, and the current 10    odometer reading taken within the last 14 days;11        (3) the number of crashes the vehicle has been 12    involved in to date;13        (4) the number of incidents as defined in subsection 14    (b) that the vehicle has been involved in to date;15        (5) the current software title and version number 16    being used to serve as part of the automated driving 17    system; and18        (6) a description of the operational design domain as 19    listed on the permit to participate in an automated 20    vehicle pilot project.21    (b) An autonomous vehicle operator shall publish an 22incident report to the public information portal within 5 days 23and send a copy of the report to the Secretary of State and the 24review committee within 5 days each time one of the following 25occurs:26        (1) The autonomous driving system on the highly   SB3308- 18 -LRB104 19909 LNS 33359 b1    automated vehicle is disengaged due to intervention of 2    operators either present in the vehicle or remotely. 3    Disengagements that occur to facilitate vehicle 4    maintenance and storage do not apply to this Section.5        (2) The highly automated vehicle is placed in a 6    minimum risk condition. The incident report shall include 7    a description of the vehicle as listed in paragraph (1) of 8    subsection (a), the odometer reading of the vehicle at the 9    time of the incident, a description of the events that 10    caused the incident, a description of actions and 11    revisions taken by the autonomous vehicle operator to 12    mitigate a repeat of the incident, and the current 13    software title and version number being used to serve as 14    part of the automated driving system at the time of the 15    incident.16    (c) An autonomous vehicle operator shall publish a crash 17report to the public information portal within 5 days and send 18a copy of the report to the Secretary of State and the review 19committee within 5 days each time the highly automated vehicle 20is involved in a crash. The crash report shall include a 21description of the vehicle as listed in paragraph (1) of 22subsection (a), the odometer reading of the vehicle at the 23time of the crash, a description of the events that caused the 24crash, a description of actions and revisions taken by the 25autonomous vehicle operator to mitigate future crashes, the 26current software title and version number being used to serve   SB3308- 19 -LRB104 19909 LNS 33359 b1as part of the automated driving system at the time of the 2crash, and a description of other property, mammals, reptiles, 3or vehicles involved in the crash. If the crash involved 4another vehicle, the description shall include the model year, 5manufacturer, model, and type of vehicle involved.6    (d) When a highly automated vehicle covered by this Act is 7involved in a crash, the autonomous vehicle operator shall 8publish to the public information portal:9        (1) a video file showing all video captured by the 10    cameras on the vehicle for a period of time beginning 15 11    minutes prior to the crash and ending 30 minutes after the 12    crash. The video shall be titled with the date of the crash 13    and the unique number of the highly automated vehicle as 14    required in paragraph (4) of subsection (c) of Section 25; 15    and16        (2) a video representation of all sensor data used in 17    detecting other objects, vehicles, and persons. The video 18    shall clearly show when an object, vehicle, or person is 19    detected or not detected. The video shall begin at least 20    15 minutes prior to the crash and end no sooner than 30 21    minutes after the crash. The video shall be titled with 22    the date of the crash and the unique number of the highly 23    automated vehicle as required in paragraph (4) of 24    subsection (c) of Section 25.25    (e) When a highly automated vehicle covered by this Act is 26involved in a crash which results in damage to property or   SB3308- 20 -LRB104 19909 LNS 33359 b1personal injury, the autonomous vehicle operator shall provide 2the following to the owner of the property, the person who has 3been injured, or the owner's or person's representative:4        (1) a video file showing all video captured by the 5    cameras on the vehicle for a period of one hour prior to 6    the crash and ending one hour after the crash;7        (2) a video representation of all sensor data used in 8    detecting other objects, vehicles, and persons. The video 9    shall clearly show when an object, vehicle, or person is 10    detected or not detected. The video shall begin at least 11    one hour prior to the crash and end no sooner than one hour 12    after the crash; and13        (3) a sworn statement that both videos accurately 14    portray the events leading up to and after the crash and 15    the data involved has not been manipulated beyond what was 16    necessary to provide the videos. 17    Section 40. Evaluation data.18    (a) As part of and to further the purposes of an automated 19vehicle pilot project, an autonomous vehicle operator is 20explicitly authorized to process evaluation data. An 21autonomous vehicle operator shall implement, maintain, and 22enforce for as long as the automated vehicle pilot project is 23in effect or as long as an autonomous vehicle operator stores 24or otherwise processes evaluation data, whichever is later, 25appropriate technical and organizational measures to ensure a   SB3308- 21 -LRB104 19909 LNS 33359 b1level of security appropriate to the risks presented by the 2processing of the evaluation data.3    (b) An autonomous vehicle operator is not allowed to sell 4or share any evaluation data to any party, nor is an autonomous 5vehicle operator allowed to use it for any purpose other than 6developing an autonomous vehicle operator's own automated 7driving systems.8    (c) An autonomous vehicle operator is not allowed to 9provide access to an autonomous vehicle operator's sensor or 10camera feeds to any law enforcement, federal agency, third 11party, business, or other entity except as provided for in 12this Section.13    (d) An autonomous vehicle operator shall publish 14evaluation data as needed to satisfy the requirements of 15Section 35. This data must have any identifying features and 16information of other parties either blurred or redacted.17    (e) All data gathered and processed under this Act shall 18comply with existing State laws governing data security and 19privacy rights. 20    Section 45. Exclusive regulation. This Act exclusively 21governs the operation of automated vehicle pilot projects in 22this State. 23    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 24becoming law.